Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB951.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1338(c)(4) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 1338. Person with disability plate and placard.* * *(c) Health care provider's statement.--* * *(4) The department shall phase out existing [handicapped] accessibility placards as soon as practicable and issue a new series to persons who comply with this section. The department shall change all references to 12345678910111213141516171819 "handicap" and "handicapped" regarding placards, parking permits and designated areas to reflect the use of the terms "accessible" and "accessibility" within materials distributed or referred to by the department or posted on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.* * *Section 2. Section 1901(c)(21) of Title 75, amended July 15, 2024 (P.L.737, No.60), is amended to read:§ 1901. Exemption of persons, entities and vehicles from fees.* * *(c) Processing fee in lieu of registration fee.--No registration fee shall be charged for vehicles registered by any of the following but the department shall charge a fee of $10 to cover the costs of processing for issuing or renewing the registration:* * *(21) Nonprofit organizations which principally serve [mentally or physically handicapped or disabled persons.] individuals with mental or physical disabilities.* * *Section 3. Section 6109(g)(5), (h)(3) and (i)(3) of Title 75 are amended to read:§ 6109. Specific powers of department and local authorities.* * *(g) Delegation of powers in cities of the first class.--* * *(5) As used in this subsection, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this paragraph:"Administer." To provide any services or materials 20250HB0951PN1018 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 necessary to enforce any ordinance or resolution enacted in order to regulate or prohibit the stopping, standing or parking of motor vehicles in a city of the first class or those certain stopping, standing and parking provisions provided in sections 3351, 3353 and 3354, including, but not limited to:(i) The installation and maintenance of all equipment, including parking meters, on and along highways, streets and roadways.(ii) The installation and maintenance of all signage, including signage for [handicapped] accessible parking, residential permit parking and loading areas, on and along highways, streets and roadways.(iii) The operation and management of any [handicapped] accessible parking, residential parking and loading area permit programs."Enforce." The issuance of parking violation notices or citations, the immobilization, towing and impoundment of motor vehicles and the collection of fines, penalties, costs and fees, including independent collection agency fees, for violations of any ordinance or resolution enacted in order to regulate or prohibit the stopping, standing or parking of motor vehicles in a city of the first class and those certain stopping, standing and parking provisions provided in this section and sections 3351, 3353 and 3354.(h) Delegation of powers in cities of the second class.--* * *(3) As used in this subsection, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this paragraph:20250HB0951PN1018 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Administer." To provide any services or materials necessary to enforce any ordinance or resolution enacted in order to regulate or prohibit the stopping, standing or parking of motor vehicles in a city of the second class or those certain stopping, standing and parking provisions provided in sections 3351, 3353 and 3354, including, but not limited to:(i) The installation and maintenance of all equipment, including parking meters, on and along highways, streets and roadways.(ii) The installation and maintenance of all signage, including signage for [handicapped] accessible parking, residential permit parking and loading areas, on and along highways, streets and roadways.(iii) The operation and management of any [handicapped] accessible parking, residential parking and loading area permit programs.(iv) The adjudication of all disputed parking violation notices or citations issued through enforcement by the parking authority in a city of the second class."Enforce." The issuance of parking violation notices or citations, the immobilization, towing and impoundment of motor vehicles and the collection of fines, penalties and costs, including independent collection agency fees, for violations of any ordinance or resolution enacted in order to regulate or prohibit the stopping, standing or parking of motor vehicles in a city of the second class and those certain stopping, standing and parking provisions provided in sections 3351, 3353 and 3354.(i) Delegation of powers in cities of the second class A and 20250HB0951PN1018 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 third class.--* * *(3) As used in this subsection, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this paragraph:"Administer." To provide any services or materials necessary to enforce any ordinance or resolution enacted in order to regulate or prohibit the stopping, standing or parking of motor vehicles in a city of the second class A or city of the third class or those certain stopping, standing and parking provisions provided in sections 3351, 3353 and 3354, including, but not limited to:(i) The installation and maintenance of all equipment, including parking meters, on and along highways, streets and roadways.(ii) The installation and maintenance of all signage, including signage for [handicapped] accessible parking, residential permit parking and loading areas, on and along highways, streets and roadways.(iii) The operation and management of any [handicapped] accessible parking, residential parking and loading area permit programs.(iv) The adjudication of all disputed parking violation notices or citations issued through enforcement by the parking authority in a city of the second class A or city of the third class."Enforce." The issuance of parking violation notices or citations, the immobilization, towing and impoundment of motor vehicles and the collection of fines, penalties and costs, including independent collection agency fees, for 20250HB0951PN1018 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 violations of any ordinance or resolution enacted in order to regulate or prohibit the stopping, standing or parking of motor vehicles in a city of the second class A and city of the third class and those certain stopping, standing and parking provisions provided in sections 3351, 3353 and 3354.* * *Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0951PN1018 - 6 - 1234567